Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.250

Records chapter applicable to.

This chapter applies to all juvenile justice or care agency records created on or after July 1, 1978.

[ 1979 c 155 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.